Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4407
Act; not construed to limit authority of political subdivision.

No provision in the Good Life Transformational Projects Act shall be construed to limit the existing statutory authority of any political subdivision.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 15.